Utah statutes.
48-2e-501.   Form of contribution.

A contribution may consist of property transferred to, services performed for, or another benefit provided to the limited partnership or an agreement to transfer property to, perform services for, or provide another benefit to the limited partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

